test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UD_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - díigud - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UD_STEM_2

     díigud+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: díigwiida
     díigud+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: díigwiidang
     díigud+V+DIRECT+PAST: díigwiidan
     díigud+V+NON_FACTIVE: díigwiidang
     díigud+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: díigwiidang
     díigud+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: díigwiidanggang
     díigud+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: díigwiidangang
     díigud+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: díigwiidiinii
     díigud+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: díigwiidaangaa
     díigud+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: díigwiidaangaan
     díigud+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: díigwiidang k̲asa'áa
     díigud+V+NEAR+FUTURE: díigwiidang k̲asa'áang
     díigud+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: díigwiidang k̲asaasdláa
     díigud+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: díigwiidang k̲asaasdláang
     díigud+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: díigwiid'ahlanggang
     díigud+V+CERTAIN+PAST: díigwiid'ahlanggan
     díigud+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: díigwiid'ahlanggiinii
     díigud+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: díigwiid'ahlans
     díigud+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: díigwiidaa'ahlang
     díigud+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: díigwiidaa'ahlanggaa
     díigud+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: díigwiidaa'ahlanggang
     díigud+V+REFLEXIVE: díigwiid'ahl
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: díigwiidang'waa
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: díigwiidang'waang
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: díigwiidang'waa.ang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: díigwiidang'anggang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: díigwiidang'angang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: díigwiidang k̲asaa'áng
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: díigwiidang k̲asaa'ánggang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: díigwiidang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: díigwiidang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: díigwiidang'ang'waa
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: díigwiidang'ang'waang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: díigwiidang'ang'waa.ang
